District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

46-712

Flight of defendant from jurisdiction of responding state.

Repealed.

History

July 10, 1957, 71 Stat. 287, Pub. L. 85-94, § 12
Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 902, 42 DCR 6748

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-312.
1973 Ed., § 30-312.